District of Columbia statutes.
10-224

Agreements for maintenance and improvement of playgrounds, etc.; transfer of funds, etc.

The maintenance and improvement of all playgrounds and recreation areas and facilities now under the control of the Board of Education, or of the Mayor of the District of Columbia, or of the National Park Service, or which may hereafter be acquired by any of said agencies for said purpose, may be provided for by agreement between the Board and the Board of Education, the Council of the District of Columbia, and the National Park Service, respectively. The Board is hereby authorized to transfer to the said agencies such funds, equipment, and personnel as may be necessary to carry said agreements into effect.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 264, ch. 265, art. III, § 4
This section is referenced in § 10-214 and § 38-401.
1981 Ed., § 8-224.
1973 Ed., § 8-217.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.